Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB531.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Older Adult Cable TV Rebate Program Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Application." An application submitted under section 3(d)."Cable TV provider." Any person or group of persons who provides cable service over a cable system and directly or through one or more affiliates owns an interest in such cable system or who otherwise controls or is responsible for, through 123456789101112131415161718 any arrangement, the management and operation of a cable system. The term does not include a provider of wireless or direct-to-home satellite transmission service."Cable TV service." Any video programming provided over a cable system under the basic cable television service tier, including installation or rental of equipment used for the receipt of such video programming. The term shall exclude all streaming platforms and services."Department." The Department of Community and Economic Development of the Commonwealth."Eligible older adult." An older adult with a household income that does not exceed 150% of the Federal poverty guidelines and who meets the eligibility requirements of section 4."Older adult." An individual 65 years of age or older."Program." The Older Adult Cable TV Rebate Program established in this act.Section 3. Older Adult Cable TV Rebate Program.(a) Establishment.--The Older Adult Cable TV Rebate Program is established in the department.(b) Purpose.--The program shall provide rebates in accordance with section 6 to eligible older adults for the reimbursement of yearly basic tier cable TV service charges assessed to the eligible older adult.(c) Regulations.--The department shall promulgate regulations for the establishment and provision of the program to provide rebates for cable TV reimbursement payments to eligible older adults as provided in this act.(d) Application.--The department shall develop an application form and the procedure for which the application 20250HB0531PN0524 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 shall be submitted. The application form shall be made available on the department's publicly accessible Internet website and by mail. An application for a rebate shall be submitted to the department.(e) Compliance.--The department shall verify that each rebate application complies with the requirements of this act.Section 4. Eligibility.An eligible older adult applying for the program under section 3 shall submit the following proof of cable TV service to the department:(1) The full name of the older adult and the full address of the household receiving the basic tier cable TV service.(2) Proof that the older adult has received or is receiving basic tier cable TV service in the form of an invoice, billing statement or other documentation from the cable TV provider.(3) Proof that the basic tier cable TV service to which the older adult subscribes is the only cable TV service available in the municipality.(4) Any additional information deemed necessary by the department.Section 5. Determination.Within 30 days of receiving and verifying the documentation required under section 4, the department shall render a determination on the application and shall notify the eligible older adult in writing of the determination. If an application is denied, the department shall provide an explanation for the denial.Section 6. Award of rebates.20250HB0531PN0524 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a) Rebate.--The department shall award rebates to eligible older adults for the purpose of reducing the recipient's obligation to the cable TV provider for basic tier cable TV service.(b) Amount.--Rebate amounts may not exceed $300 annually.(c) Awarding of rebate.--The department shall award a rebate upon approval of an eligible older adult's application.Section 7. Penalties.If an eligible older adult willfully makes a false statement or misrepresentation regarding material facts disclosed on the application or in the required documentation under this act, the eligible older adult shall be liable to repay a sum equal to the amount of rebate awards received and shall be assessed a penalty not to exceed $100.Section 8. Appropriation.Money shall be appropriated to the department for the purpose of awarding rebates under the program. The department may use a portion of the money appropriated to cover administrative costs of the program.Section 9. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0531PN0524 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021